Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-17,114
Credit Union Act Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Credit Union Act Fund. All funds available from the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund shall be collected by the department and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Credit Union Act Fund. The fund shall be administered by the department and used only for offsetting costs associated with the examination and supervision of federally insured, state-organized credit unions. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 114.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.